California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

39722.

UHT reduced-fat milk shall contain not more than 2.1 percent milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent milk solids-not-fat. UHT lowfat or light (lite) milk shall contain not more than 1.2 percent milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent milk solids-not-fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 44.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

39723.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, UHT lowfat milk shall meet all the standards and requirements which are specified in this division for market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. UHT Nonfat Milk, Skim Milk, or Fat-Free Milk [39731. - 39733.]

39731.

UHT nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk is the product that results from the complete or partial removal of milk fat from market milk. It shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701. It may contain harmless edible stabilizers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. UHT nonfat milk shall be homogenized. The product may be called “nonfat milk,” “skim milk,” or “fat-free milk.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 45.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

39732.

UHT nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk shall contain not more than twenty hundredths of 1 percent of milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent milk solids-not-fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 46.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

39733.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, UHT nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk shall meet all the standards and requirements that are specified in this division for market milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 47.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. UHT Flavored Milk [39741. - 39742.]

39741.

UHT flavored milk is market milk, evaporated market milk, condensed market milk, or dried market milk, or any combination of them, which contains harmless sweetening, chocolate, chocolate syrup, or other harmless syrup or flavoring, or any combination of these syrups or flavorings, and harmless edible stabilizers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. It is homogenized, processed, and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

39742.

UHT flavored milk shall contain not less than 3 percent milk fat and not less than 1612 percent total solids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. UHT Flavored Cream [39751. - 39752.]

39751.

UHT flavored cream is market cream to which nonfat dry milk solids derived from market milk have been added, which contains harmless flavoring or syrup, or any combination of harmless flavorings or syrups, and harmless edible stabilizers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and harmless stabilizing salts. It is homogenized, processed, and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

39752.

UHT flavored cream shall contain not less than 20 percent milk fat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. UHT Flavored Reduced-Fat Milk and UHT Flavored Lowfat or Light Milk [39761. - 39762.]

39761.

UHT flavored reduced-fat, lowfat, or light (lite) milk is market milk, evaporated market milk, condensed market milk, or dried market milk, or any combination thereof, which contains harmless sweetening, chocolate, chocolate syrup, or other harmless syrup or flavoring, or any combination of these syrups or flavorings, and harmless edible stabilizers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. UHT flavored reduced-fat, lowfat, or light (lite) milk shall be homogenized, processed, and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 48.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

39762.

UHT flavored reduced-fat milk shall contain not more than 2.1 percent milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent milk solids-not-fat. UHT flavored lowfat or light (lite) milk shall contain not more than 1.2 percent milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent solids-not-fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 232, Sec. 10.   Effective August 4, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. UHT Flavored Drink [39771. - 39771.]

39771.

UHT flavored drink is milk or skim milk, evaporated, condensed, or dried milk, or nonfat milk solids, or any combination thereof, which contains harmless sweetening, chocolate, chocolate syrup, or other harmless syrup or flavoring, or any combination of these syrups or flavorings, and harmless edible stabilizer as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. It may be homogenized and shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. UHT Half-and-Half [39781. - 39782.]

39781.

UHT half-and-half is a product consisting of market milk, market cream, nonfat dry milk derived from market milk, and market skim milk to which edible stabilizers and stabilizing salts may be added. It shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39782.

UHT half-and-half shall contain not less than 10.5 percent milk fat and not more than six-tenths of 1 percent stabilizer by weight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. UHT Sour Flavored Half-and-Half [39791. - 39792.]

39791.

UHT flavored reduced-fat sour cream is a product consisting of market milk, market cream, and market skim milk to which edible stabilizers, stabilizing salts, and acidified flavoring may be added. It shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 50.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

39792.

UHT sour flavored half-and-half shall contain not less than 9.4 percent milk fat and not more than six-tenths of 1 percent stabilizer by weight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. UHT Sour Cream [39801. - 39802.]

39801.

UHT sour cream is market cream cultured with the addition of pure cultures of one or more strains of lactic acid bacteria. It may include one or more of the following optional ingredients: milk solids-not-fat derived from market milk, salt, or lactose. Harmless edible stabilizers and emulsifiers may be added to the extent required to accomplish the necessary physical effect. It shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39802.

UHT sour cream shall contain not less than 18 percent milk fat and not less than one-half of 1 percent acidity, expressed as lactic acid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. UHT Milk Drink Mix [39811. - 39812.]

39811.

UHT milk drink mix is a market milk product which has been processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39812.

UHT milk drink mix shall contain not less than 12 percent total milk solids, not less than 4 percent butterfat, and not more than one-half of 1 percent pure and harmless edible stabilizer by weight. It may contain sweetening and harmless coloring and flavoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. UHT Dairy Spread [39821. - 39822.]

39821.

UHT dairy spread is a product made from milk, cream, skim milk, or nonfat milk solids, or any combination thereof, to which may be added lactose, sodium caseinate, emulsifiers, stabilizers, stabilizing salts, and harmless coloring. The product shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39822.

UHT dairy spread shall contain not less than 30 percent milk fat and not more than six-tenths of 1 percent stabilizer and emulsifier combined by weight, unless otherwise stated on the label.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. UHT Eggnog [39831. - 39833.]

39831.

UHT eggnog is an unfrozen product which is made with milk, cream, evaporated or condensed milk, evaporated or condensed skim milk, dry milk solids, nonfat dry milk solids, buttermilk, whey, lactose, lactalbumins, lactoglobulins, and modified whey, or any combination thereof, egg yolk or whole eggs, sweetening, and harmless flavoring with or without harmless coloring. Harmless edible stabilizers may be added. UHT eggnog may contain ingredients authorized by the director, by regulation, under Section 38791.5. It shall be processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39832.

UHT eggnog shall contain not less than 6 percent milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent milk solids-not-fat. It shall contain not less than one-half of 1 percent by weight of wholesome fresh egg yolk solids or the equivalent amount of egg yolk solids obtained from wholesome frozen egg yolks or from wholesome dried egg yolks or the equivalent amount in other approved form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

39833.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, UHT eggnog shall meet all the standards and requirements which are specified in this division for eggnog.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 17.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. UHT Flavored Nonfat Milk [39841. - 39842.]

39841.

UHT flavored nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk is market milk from which has been removed all or part of the milk fat and to which has been added any harmless syrup or flavoring, harmless sweetening, and harmless edible stabilizer. It is homogenized and processed and packaged pursuant to Section 39701. The product may be called “UHT flavored nonfat milk,” “UHT flavored skim milk,” or “UHT flavored fat-free milk” and the principal flavor may be substituted for the word “flavored” in the name of the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 51.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

39842.

UHT flavored nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk shall contain not more than twenty hundredths of 1 percent of milk fat and not less than 8.25 percent of milk solids-not-fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 52.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Dairy Beverages [39901. - 39912.]

39901.

(a) Dairy beverages are milk and dairy food beverages resembling milk or milk products. However, dairy beverages do not conform to the compositional standards for milk or milk products as established in this code or Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations because they contain safe and suitable ingredients or combinations of ingredients not specified in those standards. Dairy beverages are products intended for consumption as a beverage. Milk or the components of milk shall comprise at least 15 percent of the product on a dry matter basis or at least 2 percent on a total weight basis.

(b) For purposes of establishing compliance with the minimum dairy ingredient criteria, dairy ingredients shall include all products, components, and derivatives of milk, including, but not limited to, whey and whey products and caseinates specified in subdivision (c) of Section 135.110 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, but excluding added lactose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

39902.

The product may not contain any added fats or oils other than milkfat, except those fats present in incidental amounts that are naturally occurring in, or contributed by, flavorings or characterizing food ingredients. When the product contains water as an ingredient, water shall be declared in the ingredient list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39903.

The product shall be pasteurized, ultra-pasteurized, or UHT processed and packaged, pursuant to the specifications and procedures for the applicable process contained in the Code of Federal Regulations. The labeling shall comply with any applicable labeling requirements contained in the Code of Federal Regulations applicable to the heat treatment used on the product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39904.

The product may be cultured with safe and suitable bacterial cultures following pasteurization, ultra-pasteurization, or UHT processing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39905.

This article does not apply to any product regulated under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 38901) as a product resembling a milk product or any dairy product for which a standard is established in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39906.

The label of all products subject to this standard shall be submitted to the secretary for approval prior to sale. In addition to the labeling requirements specified in this article, the secretary may, by regulation, require or prohibit any other information, format, or design for the label that the secretary determines to be in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39907.

(a) The term “dairy beverage” or “a dairy beverage” may appear on the principal display panel of the product only when milk and the components or derivatives of milk comprise at least 30 percent of the product on a dry matter basis, or at least 4 percent on a total weight basis.

(b) When the term “dairy beverage” or “a dairy beverage” appears on the principal display panel, it shall be in letters not exceeding the height of the largest letters on the principal display panel.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when the term “dairy beverage” or “a dairy beverage” appears on the information panel of the label of the product, it shall be clearly and conspicuously labeled in bold type and of a type size equal to that used in the ingredient list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39908.

The product shall be labeled with a common or usual name of the beverage or a fanciful name that does not mislead, deceive, or confuse the consumer. Use of the name “dairy beverage” or “a dairy beverage” is restricted to products that conform to the requirements of Section 39907. The name shall not cause the consumer to believe that the product is a milk product for which a standard is established in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39909.

Each container that contains the product shall be labeled with the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor, and in the event the address is not the address of the manufacturer or final packaging plant, the label shall include the national uniform federal information processing standards state code number to be immediately followed by a hyphen and the plant number assigned by the appropriate state regulatory agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39910.

If the product is labeled “Grade A,” all dairy ingredients shall be derived from market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39911.

The label of the product may contain references to, and comparisons with, a milk product if those statements, symbols, marks, designs, or representations are reasonable, relevant, truthful, complete, and not deceptive or misleading. The secretary may require satisfactory proof of the compliance of any label with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

39912.

No product subject to this standard shall be advertised, displayed for sale, or sold in any manner or under any circumstances or conditions that are likely to mislead, deceive, or confuse consumers into believing the products are products defined in this division. The secretary may require satisfactory proof of the compliance of a dairy beverage with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 47.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. CERTIFICATION, PROCESSING AND CANNING, AND CANNED FOODS [40501. - 41867.]



CHAPTER 1. Certification of Agricultural Products [40501. - 40577.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [40501. - 40502.]

40501.

This chapter does not apply to any investigation which is made or any certificate which is issued by any of the following:

(a) Any person, firm, or corporation in respect to canned or dried fruit which is shipped, packed, or stored by it.

(b) Any bona fide chamber of commerce, board of trade, or other bona fide nonprofit association of producers or merchants in respect to canned or dried fruit which is sold, shipped, packed, or stored by any of its members or other persons for whom it may make any such inspection or issue any such certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

40502.

The director may cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigation and Certification [40531. - 40535.]

40531.

The department may investigate and certify to other states and countries, shippers, or other financially interested parties the analysis, classification, grade, quality, or condition of any fruit, vegetable, or other agricultural product, either raw or processed, under regulations that the department may adopt, including the payment of reasonable service charges, the frequency of payment of the service charges, the procedure for payment, the procedure for refunds, and the penalties for late payment. The department may accredit persons or business entities to conduct the investigation or certification, or both the investigation and certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 436, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

40532.

Every certificate which relates to the analysis, classification, condition, grade, or quality of any agricultural product, either raw or processed, and every duly certified copy of such certificate, is prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements which are contained in it, if duly issued in accordance with any of the following:

(a) By the director under authority of this code.

(b) In cooperation between federal and state agencies, authorities, or organizations under authority of an act of Congress and an act of the legislature of any state.

(c) Under authority of a federal statute.

The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof, but it does not apply in a criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

40533.

Any certificate which is issued by the state pursuant to this chapter or by any person shall truly state the grade, quality, and condition of the product which is certified. A true copy of any such certificate shall be furnished to the director or to the commissioner of the county where the shipment originated, on demand which is made in writing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

40534.

The director may contract with the United States Department of Agriculture to provide inspection and certification service for eggs and egg products and poultry meat classification pursuant to United States Department of Agriculture standards. The director may also contract with commissioners to perform such inspection and certification services pursuant to such contracts with the United States Department of Agriculture and for the enforcement of egg and poultry meat classification standards of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

40535.

(a) There is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, the Analytical Laboratory Account, into which the residual balance of all reimbursements collected by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture for services rendered by the Center for Analytical Chemistry shall be deposited at the end of each fiscal year.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 221, upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds deposited in the Analytical Laboratory Account shall be used to fund services rendered, laboratory equipment repair or replacement, make modifications or upgrades to existing facilities, or for other uses that maintain the laboratory infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Funds [40561. - 40562.]

40561.

Any money which is collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

40562.

Within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year, the director shall prepare a statement which shows the receipt and expenditure during the fiscal year of funds provided for in this chapter. He shall, upon written request, forward a copy of this report to any party that is financially interested in the inspection work which is conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Shipping Point Advisory Committee [40571. - 40577.5.]

40571.

There is in the department a Shipping Point Advisory Committee consisting of nine members. The committee shall be appointed by the director and shall be composed of shippers of fruits and vegetables using inspection and certification services of the department. The director may appoint one additional member on the committee, who shall be a public member. Members of the committee shall receive no salary.

Upon the director’s request, the committee shall submit to the director the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, or processor nor financially interested in any producer, shipper, or processor, for appointment by the director as a public member of the committee. The director may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the committee. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the director, the committee shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the director has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the committee shall be filled by appointment by the director from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified submitted by the committee. The public member of the committee shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the committee and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

40571.1.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that shippers of fruits and vegetables appointed to the Shipping Point Advisory Committee pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such committee, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------

40572.

The term of office of the members of the committee is three years. Appointment of the first members shall be made so that the terms of office of three members shall expire at the end of one year and three at the end of two years and three at the end of three years. Thereafter appointment shall be for full three-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

40573.

The committee shall be advisory to the director on all matters pertaining to this chapter and shall make recommendations concerning the inspection and certification services rendered, including the annual budget and fees necessary to provide adequate inspection and certification services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

40574.

The director shall appoint an alternate for each committee member. In making these appointments, the director shall use the same criteria in selecting alternates as the regular members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 996, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

40575.

Alternate members shall serve at committee meetings only in the absence of the member for whom the alternate is designated to serve in place of.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 996, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40576.

Each member of the committee, or any alternate member serving in the absence of a regular member, may, with the approval of the director, be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her official duties. However, a member or alternate member may not receive any other consideration for serving on the committee. The reimbursement shall be made at the rate permitted under the rules of the Department of Human Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 23.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

40577.

(a) In order to operate economically and reduce expenses that may adversely impact persons subject to this chapter, on or before May 1 of any year, the committee may request the secretary, and the secretary may utilize any appropriate entity, to supply the field staff, office facilities, and supplies necessary to provide inspection services.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the secretary is responsible for the administration of this chapter, the establishment of administrative procedures, and the uniformity, accuracy, and integrity of the inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 542, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40577.1.

The secretary may establish rules and procedures to guide the entity described in Section 40577. The procedures may provide for all of the following:

(a) Employment, training, supervision, and compensation of inspectors.

(b) Use of existing, and acquisition of additional, equipment and supplies for field or office use.

(c) Leasing of facilities to support inspection activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 542, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40577.2.

The committee shall not request that the secretary utilize, and the secretary shall not utilize, an entity a majority of whose officers and employees are persons utilizing services provided by the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 542, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40577.3.

The entity shall keep an accurate record of expenses incurred in performing its responsibilities. Those records shall be available for audit during regular business hours upon request of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 542, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40577.4.

The secretary may require an entity to correct or cease any activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest, or that is in violation of this chapter, and shall notify the entity in writing of these specific acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 542, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40577.5.

The secretary shall reimburse the entity for its actual and necessary expenses upon receipt of an invoice approved by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 542, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Standards for Tomatoes [40701. - 41010.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [40701. - 40703.]

40701.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

40702.

“Processing purposes” means tomatoes intended for the commercial production of processed products such as sliced, diced, quartered, halved, and whole tomatoes, tomato paste, puree, pulp, catsup, sauce, tomatoes in oil, juice, powder, flakes, and similar manufactured tomato products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

40703.

“Committee” means the Processing Tomato Advisory Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [40730. - 40732.]

40730.

The director shall not enforce this article during the period that any marketing order or commission covering the same subject is in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

40731.

The standards which are established as authorized by this chapter are the only standards of quality for processing tomatoes that the director shall enforce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

40732.

Tomatoes for processing purposes, except hard green tomatoes for use in the manufacture of green tomato products, shall conform to the standards established under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulations [40760. - 40761.]

40760.

The director shall not enforce this article during the period that any marketing order or commission covering the same subject is in effect. Section 58601) of Division 21 covering the same subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

40761.

The committee may submit to the director proposed regulations under this chapter. The director may adopt and enforce regulations for the following:

(a) Minimum standards and tolerances, for processing tomatoes which shall be cause for rejection by the director. However, no emergency regulations shall be established which raise or lower standards and tolerances.

(b) Minimum standards for color of processing tomatoes based on a comminuted raw product sample which shall be cause for rejection by the director. However, no emergency regulations shall be established which tend to raise or lower the comminuted color readings.

(c) Standards for processing tomatoes which shall not be cause for rejection by the director.

(d) Sampling and inspection procedures for processing tomatoes.

(e) Fees calculated to cover expected costs involved in the department performing the services specified in this chapter and in carrying out the regulations adopted under this chapter.

(f) Sanitation, equipment, inspection stations, and load identification data. 

(g) Other regulations which are reasonably necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers of the Director [40781. - 40782.]

40781.

The director may, for the purpose of inspection, enter any place where processing tomatoes may be found. The director may take for inspection samples as may be necessary to determine if any uncertified lot, load, or container of processing tomatoes complies with the standards established pursuant to this chapter. The director may subject samples to any method of inspection or testing as prescribed by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

40782.

The director may cause the prosecution of any person violating any provision of this chapter, and may seize and hold the portion of any lot or load of tomatoes for processing purposes involved in a violation as may, in his or her judgment, be necessary as evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Inspection and Certification by the Director [40810. - 40815.]

40810.

The director shall not enforce this article during the period that any marketing order or commission covering the same subject is in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

40811.

The director shall inspect deliveries of tomatoes for processing purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

40812.

If the director finds that the tomatoes which are being delivered conform with the standards prescribed by regulations, the director shall issue a certificate to that effect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

40813.

If the director finds that the tomatoes delivered do not conform with the standards prescribed by regulations, the director shall issue a notice of rejection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

40814.

The director is not required to perform inspection at any place where adequate inspection facilities are not provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

40815.

The inspection certificate which is issued pursuant to this chapter is prima facie evidence of the percentage of defects according to the definition of such defects as defined by regulations. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof, but it does not apply in a criminal action.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contract Inspection [40871. - 40874.]

40871.

Loads of tomatoes which are offered for delivery by a producer to a processor in accordance with the terms of a contract between them shall be given inspection as may be required without undue delay and within a reasonable time after the load arrives at the processor or other point which is specified for the inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

40872.

Any load of tomatoes which is so offered for inspection and delivery that is rendered unsuitable for processing purposes as a direct result of unwarranted delay in inspection, willfully or negligently caused or permitted by the processor, shall be paid for by the processor at the full price that is agreed upon for tomatoes suitable for processing purposes and on the basis that the tomatoes were of the grade, quality, and condition which is stipulated in the contract.

If no price is stipulated in the contract, payment shall be made by the processor to the producer on the basis of the then prevailing market price for tomatoes of the grade, quality, and condition which is specified in the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

40873.

In addition to any other remedy, the producer so offering for inspection and delivery any load of tomatoes that has incurred any added handling costs as a direct result of the unwarranted delay in inspection and delivery, willfully or negligently caused or permitted by a processor, may recover the amount of the added handling costs by an action at law against the processor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

40874.

No producer shall have any rights under this article unless he shall register each load of tomatoes with the processor at the time he offers the load for inspection and delivery. The registration shall be made by obtaining from the processor a certificate, which the processor is, by this provision, required to furnish, that states the time of arrival of the load at the processor or other specified inspection point.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Discrimination in Furnishing Raw Product Containers [40901. - 40902.]

40901.

The failure of a processor willfully and without due cause to furnish raw product containers to a producer as agreed upon, or any willful discrimination against any producer in this regard, shall subject such processor to an action for all damages which are sustained by the producer as a direct result of the failure or discrimination, and judgment against any processor may be entered in the discretion of the court either for the amount of the damages sustained or for three times the amount. Treble damages may, however, only be awarded if the producer has furnished the processor written notice of the claimed failure or discrimination within 48 hours after the claimed failure or discrimination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 676, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

40902.

This article does not affect existing remedies for the violation of a contract but is in addition to such existing remedies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 783.)